Utah, session 2026, HB458.
Section 1. Section 26B-2-244 is enacted to read:26B-2-244. Preterm birth at a health care facility.(1)(a)As used in this section, "preterm birth" means a birth that occurs before 36 weeks of gestation.(b)"Preterm birth" includes:(i)"extremely preterm birth" or "periviable birth" which mean a birth that occurs before 25 weeks;(ii)"late preterm birth" which means a birth that occurs between 34 and 36 weeks;(iii)"moderately preterm birth" which means a birth that occurs between 32 and 34 weeks; and(iv)"very preterm birth" which means a birth that occurs between 25 and 32 weeks.(2)A health care facility that provides birthing services shall develop policies regarding preterm birth, including:(a)types of lifesaving care that the facility is able and willing to provide for each type of preterm birth; and(b)transferring a patient to a different health care facility that can provide treatment at a lower gestational age.(3)A health care facility that provides birthing services shall publish the policies described in Subsection (2) in a conspicuous place on the health care facility's website.(4)A health care facility that provides birthing services may not deny an infant lifesaving care based solely on the gestational age of the infant at birth.(5)A health care facility shall, as soon as reasonably possible, inform an individual at risk for preterm birth of the health care facility's:(a)current capacity to treat each type of preterm birth;(b)plan to transport the individual if appropriate; and(c)policies described in Subsection (2).(6)A parent that is experiencing or expected to imminently experience preterm birth has a right to:(a)be informed in a timely manner of the health care facility's capabilities to provide lifesaving care for a preterm infant;(b)request a transfer to a different health care facility that cares for infants at younger gestational ages;(c)consult with a maternal fetal medicine provider and a neonatologist regarding treatment options; and(d)shared decision making with providers described in Subsection (6)(c).(7)An attending provider at a health care facility that provides birthing services shall consult with a neonatologist if:(a)the provider determines that a consultation is medically appropriate; or(b)a parent that is experiencing or expected to imminently experience preterm birth requests the consultation.(8)A health care facility that provides birthing services shall report data annually to the department including:(a)the number of neonatal patients treated;(b)the frequency of transfers for a higher level of medical care;(c)the number and types of neonatal interventions performed; and(d)survival rates and gestational age for each extremely preterm birth.(9)The department shall publish an annual statewide neonatal outcome report including:(a)aggregated statewide survival trends; and(b)comparisons across levels of neonatal intensive care units.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 58-88-301 is enacted to read:3. Prenatal, Birthing, and Postpartum Health Professions58-88-301. Definitions.As used in this part, "prenatal health care provider" means a person that provides health care to a pregnant individual prior to the birth of a child and:(1)is licensed under:(a)Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act;(b)Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act;(c)Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act;(d)Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;(e)Chapter 70a, Utah Physician Assistant Act;(f)Chapter 71, Naturopathic Physician Practice Act;(g)Chapter 77, Direct-Entry Midwife Act; or(h)Chapter 81, Retired Volunteer Health Care Practitioner Act; or(2)is an unlicensed direct-entry midwife as defined in Section 58-77-102.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 58-88-302 is enacted to read:58-88-302. Prenatal care.(1)No later than approximately 20 weeks of gestation, a prenatal health care provider shall discuss the following with a pregnant individual:(a)the signs and risks of preterm labor;(b)the difference in treatment capabilities and outcomes for different levels of neonatal intensive care units in the area;(c)a plan for where the pregnant individual should go for medical care if the individual may be experiencing specific problems with the individual's pregnancy:(i)before 25 weeks gestation;(ii)between 25 and 31 weeks gestation;(iii)between 32 and 36 weeks gestation; and(iv)at more than 36 weeks gestation;(d)the ability for the prenatal health care provider and pregnant individual to consult with a neonatologist prior to labor or birth; and(e)the patient's rights described in Subsection 26B-2-244(6).(2)If an individual is anticipated to have an expected preterm birth, the individual's prenatal health care provider shall recommend that the individual receive a neonatology consultation prior to birth.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.